hfst/adv-som-lex.txt
LEXICON Adverb
Multiwords ; 
Advs ; 

LEXICON Advs
! These have morphology
halkaas		AdvEnd	"there"                           ; 
markaas		AdvEnd	"at that time, when"              ; 

maanta		AdvEnd	"today" ; 

LEXICON Misc
kala		AdvEnd 	"separately" ; ! adv or verbal particle thing?

LEXICON Multiwords
marka% hore		AdvEnd 	"firstly"                      ;
khaas% ahaan	AdvEnd 		"especially"               ;
isla% markaasi	AdvEnd 		"at the same time"         ;
ka% dib			AdvEnd 	"afterwards, after"            ;
! Some of these probably shouldn't be here?
ilaa			AdvEnd "until" ;

LEXICON AdvEnd
+Adv: 		# ; 
